District of Columbia statutes.
4-1204

Timeframes for emergency assistance; procedures for application.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 5, 36 DCR 553
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-137, § 2, 41 DCR 3008
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 10, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-1004.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-1201.